Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 15. Joint municipal electric power.
§ 77-5-727.
Determining appropriateness of projects to be undertaken by joint agencies; objections; appeal process.

No joint agency shall undertake any project required to be financed, in whole or in part, with the proceeds of bonds without the approval of a majority of its members. Before undertaking any project, a joint agency shall, based upon engineering studies and reports, determine that such project is required to provide for the projected needs for power and energy of its members from and after the date the project is estimated to be placed in normal and continuous operation and for a reasonable period of time thereafter. In determining the future power requirements of the members of a joint agency, there shall be taken into account the following:

The economies and efficiencies estimated to be achieved in acquiring, constructing and operating the proposed facilities for the generation and transmission of electric power and energy;

The estimated requirements for power and energy and for reserve capacity and to meet obligations under pooling and reserve sharing agreements reasonably related to its needs for power and energy to which the joint agency is or may become a party; and

The cost of such existing alternative power supply sources.

A determinationby the joint agency based upon appropriate findings of the foregoingmatters shall be conclusive as to the appropriateness of a projectto provide the needs of the members of a joint agency for power andenergy unless an interested party aggrieved by the determination ofsaid joint agency shall file an appeal therefrom as herein provided.Notice of the determination by the joint agency shall be publishedone (1) time in one or more newspapers having general circulationin each of the municipalities constituting the membership of the jointagency and shall specify a date, not less than ten (10) days afterthe publication of such notice, at which the joint agency shall meetto hear any objections or remonstrances that may be made. At saidmeeting, the commissioners of the joint agency shall consider theobjections or protests, if any, and shall at said meeting, or at anyadjourned meeting, affirm, modify or rescind the determination. Anyperson or party objecting or protesting the determination at saidmeeting who is aggrieved by the action of said joint agency may appealwithin ten (10) days from the date of adjournment at which sessionthe joint agency rendered said determination, and may embody the factsand determination in a bill of exceptions which shall be signed bythe person acting as chairman of the board of commissioners of thejoint agency. The secretary thereof shall transmit at once the billof exceptions to the circuit court of the county in which the principaloffice of the joint agency is located, and the court shall eitherin termtime or in vacation hear and determine the same on the caseas presented by the bill of exceptions as an appellate court, andshall affirm or reverse the determination of the joint agency. Ifthe determination of the joint agency be reversed, the circuit courtshall certify the same to the board of commissioners of the jointagency. Costs shall be awarded as in other cases. The joint agencymay employ counsel to defend such appeals to be paid out of the fundsof the joint agency. Any such appeal may be heard and determined invacation in the discretion of the court on motion of either partyon written notice of ten (10) days to the other party or parties orthe attorney of record, and the hearing of the same shall be heldin the county where the suit is pending unless the judge in his ordershall otherwise direct. Provided, however, no appeal to the circuitcourt shall be taken from any order or determination of the jointagency which authorizes the issuance or sale of bonds, but all objectionsto any matters relating to the issuance or sale of bonds shall beadjudicated and determined by the chancery court, in accordance withthe provisions of Sections 31-13-5 through 31-13-11.

Nothing herein contained shall prevent a joint agency from undertaking studies to determine whether there is a need for a project or whether such project is feasible.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 11(2), eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-729.
Member municipalities may contract to buy power from joint agencies.

Any municipality which is a member of the joint agency may contract to buy from the joint agency power and energy required for its present or future requirements, including the capacity and output of one or more specified projects. As the creation of a joint agency is an alternative method whereby a municipality may obtain the benefits and assume the responsibilities of ownership in a project, any such contract may provide that the municipality so contracting shall be obligated to make the payments required by the contract whether or not a project is completed, operable, operating, retired or decommissioned and notwithstanding the suspension, interruption, interference, reduction, curtailment or termination of the output of a project or the power and energy contracted for, and that such payments under the contract shall not be subject to any reduction whether by offset or otherwise, and shall not be conditioned upon the performance or nonperformance of the joint agency or any other member of the joint agency under the contract or any other instrument. Any contract with respect to the sale or purchase of capacity or output of a project entered into between a joint agency and its member municipalities may also provide that if one or more of such municipalities shall default in the payment of its or their obligations, with respect to the purchase of said capacity or output, then in that event the remaining member municipalities which are purchasing capacity and output under the contract shall be required to accept and pay for and shall be entitled proportionately to and may use or otherwise dispose of the capacity or output which was to be purchased by the defaulting municipality.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, any such contracts with respect to the sale or purchase of capacity, output, power or energy from a project may extend for a period not exceeding fifty (50) years from the date a project is estimated to be placed in normal continuous operation; and the execution and effectiveness thereof shall not be subject to any authorizations or approvals by the state or any agency, commission or instrumentality or political subdivision thereof except as in this article specifically required and provided.

Payments by a municipality under any contract for the purchase of capacity and output from a joint agency shall be made solely from the revenues derived from the ownership and operation of the electric system of said municipality and any obligation under such contract shall not constitute a legal or equitable pledge, charge, lien or encumbrance upon any property of the municipality or upon any of its income, receipts or revenues, except the revenues of its electric system, and neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the municipality are, or may be, pledged for the payment of any obligation under any such contract. A municipality shall be obligated to fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for electric power and energy and other services, facilities and commodities, sold, furnished or supplied through its electric system sufficient to provide revenues adequate to meet its obligations under any such contract and to pay any and all other amounts payable from or constituting a charge and lien upon such revenues, including amounts sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on bonds heretofore or hereafter issued by the municipality for purposes related to its electric system.

Any municipality which is a member of a joint agency may furnish the joint agency with money derived solely from the ownership and operation of its electric system or facilities and may make available for the use of the joint agency any personnel, equipment and property, both real and personal, which is a part of its electric system or facilities.

Any member of a joint agency may contract for, advance or contribute funds derived solely from the ownership and operation of its electric system or facilities to a joint agency as may be agreed upon by the joint agency and the member, and the joint agency shall repay such advances or contributions from proceeds of bonds, from operating revenues or from any other funds of the joint agency, together with interest thereon as may be agreed upon by the member and the joint agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-731.
Sale or exchange by joint agency of excess capacity or output.

A joint agency may sell or exchange the excess capacity or output of a project not then required by any of its members for such consideration and for such period and upon such other terms and conditions as may be determined by the parties to any municipality in this state or any other state owning electric distribution facilities, to any political subdivisions, agencies or instrumentalities of any other state, to other joint agencies organized pursuant to this article, to any electric power association, to any public or private utility, or to any other state, federal or municipal agency which owns electric generation, transmission or distribution facilities either within or without this state. Provided, however, that sales of excess capacity or output of a project to electric power associations, public or private utilities, and other persons the interest on whose securities and other obligations are not exempt from taxation by the federal government shall not be made in such amounts, for such periods of time, and under such terms and conditions as will cause the interest on bonds issued to finance the cost of a project to become taxable by the federal government.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 13; Laws, 1981, ch. 280, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1981).

§ 77-5-733.
Joint or several ownership and maintenance by municipalities and joint agencies with other public agencies.

The definitions and all other terms and provisions of this article shall be construed so as to include and authorize the joint or several ownership, operation, and/or maintenance by one or more municipalities or joint agencies of a project, or any undivided ownership interest therein, with any person, firm, association or corporation, public or private, engaged in the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power or energy either within or without this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-735.
Exemption from laws relating to competitive bidding.

A municipality’s or joint agency’s purchase of, contract for the acquisition of, or contract for any property, including any project or interest therein, or the construction of, or the operation and maintenance of, any project, owned or to be owned jointly by such municipality or joint agency with any person, firm or corporation engaged in the generation, transmission or distribution of electricity, either within or without this state, other than with a municipality of this state or a joint agency created pursuant to this article, may be made or entered into without meeting the requirements of any law relating to acquisitions, purchases or contracts by competitive bids where the interest to be acquired by such municipality or joint agency in such property or project is twenty-five percent (25%) or less.

If a municipality or joint agency which finds and records on its minutes that acquisition of any project, or any interest therein, or any portion thereof, or any property or any interest therein or any portion thereof, which is authorized by this article is available or can be acquired or contracted for from or with only a single source, person, firm or corporation, then such acquisition or contract may be made or entered into without meeting the requirements of any law relating to acquisitions, purchases or contracts by competitive bids. If, after advertising for competitive bids as to other proposed purchases, acquisitions or contracts, only one (1) bid is received, the municipality or joint agency, as the case may be, may reject the bid and negotiate privately any purchase, contract or acquisition for a consideration not exceeding that proposed in the bid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 15; Laws, 1979, ch. 391, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1979).

§ 77-5-737.
Joint agency pledge bonds.

A joint agency may issue its bonds pledging to the payment thereof as to both principal and interest the revenues or any portion thereof, derived or to be derived from all or any of its projects, and any additions and betterments thereto or extensions thereof, or contributions or advances from its members. Bonds of a joint agency shall be authorized by a resolution adopted by its governing board and spread upon its minutes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-739.
Issuance of bonds by municipalities and joint agencies.

Each municipality and joint agency is hereby authorized to issue at one (1) time or from time to time its bonds for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any of the purposes authorized by this article. The principal of, premium, if any, and the interest on such bonds shall be payable solely from the respective funds herein provided for such payment. The bonds of each issue shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be determined by the issuer, provided that the bonds of any issue shall not bear a greater overall interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103. The bonds of each issue shall be dated and shall mature in such amounts and at such time or times, either as serial bonds or term bonds or a combination of serial and term bonds, not exceeding fifty (50) years from their respective date or dates, as may be determined by the governing board of the issuer, and may be made redeemable before maturity at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the governing board of the issuer prior to the issuance of the bonds. The governing board of the issuer shall determine the form and the manner of execution of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the state. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bond, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. The governing board of the issuer may also provide for the authentication of the bonds by a trustee or fiscal agent. The bonds may be issued in coupon or in fully registered form, or both, as the governing board of the issuer may determine, and provisions may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest. All bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

All bonds issued pursuant to this article shall be advertised and sold on sealed bids in the manner provided under the provisions of Section 31-19-25; provided that on bond sales in excess of Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) the joint agency may sell its bonds by negotiated sale at not less than ninety-eight percent (98%) of par, plus accrued interest, when the joint agency has employed a nationally recognized financial advisor for the proposed bond issue. The duties of the financial advisor shall include the responsibility of preparing a statement to be submitted to the Governor, the chairman of the house ways and means committee and the chairman of the senate finance committee which shall clearly set forth the reasons why the negotiated sale was considered to be in the best interest of the joint agency and member municipalities, including the estimated savings in cost by selling the bonds at a negotiated sale.

The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the purposes for which such bonds have been issued, and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the governing board of the issuer may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds. The municipality or joint agency may issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The municipality or joint agency may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall have become mutilated or shall have been destroyed or lost.

Bonds may be issued under the provisions of this article without obtaining the consent of the state or of any political subdivision, or of any agency, commission or instrumentality of either thereof, and without any other approvals, proceedings or the happening of any conditions or things other than those approvals, proceedings, conditions or things which are specifically required by this article and the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or the trust agreement securing the same; provided, however, no joint agency created pursuant to the article shall issue any bonds pursuant to the article, unless and until the issuance of said bonds is approved by each of the governing authorities of the municipalities which are members of the joint agency.

All bonds issued pursuant to this article shall be fully negotiable in accordance with their terms and shall be “securities” within the meaning of Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code, subject only to provisions of the bonds pertaining to registration.

The state hereby covenants with the holders of any bonds issued pursuant to this article that so long as such bonds are outstanding and unpaid the state will not terminate the existence of nor limit or alter the rights and powers of a municipality or a joint agency under this article to conduct the activities referred to herein in any way pertinent to the interests of the bondholders, including, without limitation, the right to charge and collect rates, fees and charges and to fulfill the terms of any covenants made with bondholders, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the bondholders, unless provision for full payment of such bonds, by escrow or otherwise, has been made pursuant to the terms of the bonds or the resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument securing the bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 17; Laws, 1979, ch. 496; Laws, 1981, ch. 329, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 477, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1985).

§ 77-5-741.
Bonds to be secured by resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument; contents.

In the discretion of the governing board of the issuer, any bonds issued under the provisions of this article may be secured by a resolution, a trust indenture or other security instrument, and in this regard the issuer may enter into an agreement with any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state to act as trustee for such bonds. Such resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders.

The resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument providing for the issuance of such bonds may, in the discretion of the governing board of the issuer, contain covenants including, but not limited to, the following:

The pledge of all or any part of the revenues derived or to be derived from the project or projects to be financed by the bonds or from the electric system or facilities of a municipality or a joint agency.

The rents, rates, fees and charges to be established, maintained and collected, and the use and disposal of revenues, gifts, grants and funds received or to be received by the municipality or joint agency.

The setting aside of reserves and the investment, regulation and disposition thereof.

The custody, collection, securing, investment, and payment of all moneys held for the payment of bonds.

Limitations or restrictions on the purposes to which the proceeds of sale of bonds then or thereafter to be issued may be applied.

Limitations or restrictions on the issuance of additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured, or the refunding of outstanding or other bonds.

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended, the percentage of bonds the bondholders of which must consent thereto and the manner in which such consent may be given.

Events of default and the rights and liabilities arising thereupon, the terms and conditions upon which bonds issued under this article shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived.

The preparation and maintenance of a budget.

The retention or employment of consulting engineers, independent auditors and other technical consultants.

Limitations on or the prohibition of free service to any person, firm or corporation, public or private.

The acquisition and disposal of property, provided that no project or part thereof shall be mortgaged by such resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument.

Provisions for insurance and for accounting reports and the inspection and audit thereof.

The continuing operation and maintenance of the project.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 18; Laws, 1981, ch. 383, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1981).

§ 77-5-743.
Fixing, charging and collecting rents, fees, rates and charges; municipalities.

A municipality is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for electric power and energy and other services, facilities and commodities sold, furnished or supplied through the facilities of its electric system or its interest in any joint project. For so long as any bonds of a municipality are outstanding and unpaid, the rents, fees and charges shall be so fixed as to provide revenues sufficient to pay all costs of and charges and expenses in connection with the proper operation and maintenance of its electric system, and its interest in any joint project, and all necessary repairs, replacements or renewals thereof, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds and other evidences of indebtedness payable from said revenues, to create and maintain reserves as may be required by any resolution authorizing and securing bonds, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds heretofore or hereafter issued to finance additions, improvements and betterments to its electric system, and to pay any and all amounts which the municipality may be obligated to pay from said revenues by law or contract. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to prohibit any municipality from expending any revenues in excess of that required herein in any manner otherwise permitted by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 19(1), eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-745.
Fixing, charging and collecting rents, fees, rates and charges; joint agencies.

A joint agency is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for electric power and energy and other services, facilities and commodities sold, furnished or supplied through the facilities of its projects. For so long as any bonds of a joint agency are outstanding and unpaid, the rents, rates, fees and charges shall be so fixed as to provide revenues sufficient to pay all costs of and charges and expenses in connection with the proper operation and maintenance of its projects, and all necessary repairs, replacements or renewals thereof, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds and other evidences of indebtedness payable from said revenues, to create and maintain reserves as may be required by any resolution authorizing and securing bonds, and to pay any and all amounts which the joint agency may be obligated to pay from said revenues by law or contract.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 19(2), eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-747.
Pledges made by municipalities or joint agencies.

Any pledge made by a municipality or joint agency pursuant to this article shall be valid and binding from the date the pledge is made. The revenues, securities and other moneys so pledged and then held or thereafter received by the municipality or joint agency or any fiduciary shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the municipality or joint agency without regard to whether such parties have notice thereof. The resolution trust indenture or other security instrument by which a pledge is created need not be filed or recorded in any manner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 19(3); Laws, 1981, ch. 383, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1981).

§ 77-5-749.
Temporary investment and reinvestment of money.

All moneys received pursuant to the authority of this article, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues may be temporarily invested and reinvested pending the disbursements thereof in such securities and other investments as may be permitted by law for investment of excess funds of municipalities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-751.
Proceedings to enforce rights of holders of bonds.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this article or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted hereunder, or, to the extent permitted by law, under such resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or under any agreement or other contract executed by the municipality or joint agency pursuant to this article, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this article or by such resolution to be performed by any joint agency or municipality or by any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging and collecting of rents, rates, fees and charges.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-753.
Bonds issued under this article as proper and legal investments.

Bonds issued by a municipality or joint agency under the provisions of this article are hereby made securities in which all public officers and agencies of the state and all political subdivisions, all insurance companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any officer or agency of the state or any political subdivision for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the state or any political subdivision is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-755.
Bonds issued as special obligations of municipality or joint agency issuing them.

The bonds shall be special obligations of the municipality or joint agency issuing them. The principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the bonds shall not be payable from the general funds of the municipality or joint agency, nor shall they constitute a legal or equitable pledge, charge, lien or encumbrance upon any of its property or upon any of its income, receipts or revenues, except the funds which are pledged under the resolution authorizing the bonds. Neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of a municipality or of the state are, or may be, pledged for the payment of the principal of or interest on the bonds, and no holder of the bonds shall have the right to compel the exercise of the taxing power by the state or a municipality or the forfeiture of any of its property in connection with any default thereon. Every bond shall recite in substance that the principal of and interest on the bond is payable solely from the revenues pledged to its payment and that the municipality or joint agency is not obligated to pay the principal or interest except from such revenues.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-757.
Refunding bonds.

A municipality or joint agency is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of refunding bonds of the municipality or joint agency for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this article, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds. The issuance of such bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties and obligations of the municipality or joint agency in respect to the same shall be governed by the provisions of this article which relate to the issuance of bonds, insofar as such provisions may be appropriate therefor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-759.
Tax exempt status; bonds.

Bonds, their transfer and the income therefrom (including any profit made on the sale thereof), shall at all times be free from taxation by the state or any political subdivision or any agency of either thereof, excepting inheritance, estate or gift taxes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-761.
Tax exempt status; interest in project owned by municipality or joint agency.

Any interest in a project owned by a municipality or owned by a joint agency shall be exempt from all state, county and local ad valorem or other property taxes. The purchase, exchange or interchange of capacity, transmission, or electric power and energy for resale by any municipality or joint agency under this article shall not be subject to sales, use or other tax. The sale of any electric power or energy from any project to any municipality shall not be subject to sales, use or other tax.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 26, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-763.
Rights, privileges and immunities of personnel.

Personnel employed or appointed by a municipality to work on a joint project or for a joint agency shall have the same authority, rights, privileges and immunities which the officers, agents and employees of the appointing municipality enjoy within the territory of that municipality, whether within or without the territory of the appointing municipality, when they are acting within the scope of their authority or in the course of their employment.

Personnel employed or appointed directly by a joint agency or by a participating municipality or by a nonprofit operating agency of the participating municipalities or of the joint agency, shall be eligible for participation in the Mississippi Public Employees Retirement System with the same rights, privileges, obligations and responsibilities as they would have if they were employees of a municipality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-765.
Dissolution of joint agencies.

Whenever the board of commissioners of a joint agency and the utility commissions of its member municipalities shall by resolution or ordinance determine that the purposes for which the joint agency was formed have been substantially fulfilled and that all bonds theretofore issued and all other obligations theretofore incurred by the joint agency have been fully paid or satisfied, such board of commissioners and utility commissions may declare the joint agency to be dissolved. On the effective date of such resolution or ordinance, the title to all funds and other property owned by the joint agency at the time of such dissolution shall vest in the member municipalities of the joint agency as provided in this article and the bylaws of the joint agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-767.
Annual reports; joint agencies; municipalities.

Each joint agency shall, following the closing of each fiscal year, submit an annual report of its activities for the preceding year to the governing authorities and to the utility commissions of its member municipalities. Each such report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering the operations of the joint agency during such year. The joint agency shall cause an audit of its books of record and accounts to be made at least once in each year by certified public accountants and the cost thereof may be treated as a part of the cost of construction of a project or projects, or otherwise as part of the expense of administration of a project covered by such audit.

The municipalities possessing ownership interests in a project shall, following the closing of each fiscal year, submit a consolidated or combined annual report of their activities with respect to such project for the preceding year to the respective governing authorities of such municipalities, each such report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering the operations of the jointly owned project during such year. The municipalities possessing ownership interests in a project shall cause an audit or the books of record and accounts relating to such project to be made at least once in each year by certified public accountants and the cost thereof may be treated as a cost of construction of the project, or otherwise as part of the expenses of the administration of the project covered by such audit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 29, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-769.
Application of laws of other states and the United States.

Legislative consent is hereby given (a) to the application of the laws of other states with respect to taxation, payments in lieu of taxes, and the assessment thereof, to any municipality or joint agency created pursuant to this article which has acquired or has an interest in a project, real or personal, situated without the state, or which owns or operates a project without the state pursuant to this article, and (b) to the application of regulatory and other laws of other states and of the United States to any municipality or joint agency which owns or operates a project without the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 30, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-771.
Grants-in-aid and loans from federal and state governments.

The governing authorities of any municipality or joint agency are hereby authorized to make application and to enter into contracts for and to accept grants-in-aid and loans from the federal and state governments and their agencies for planning, acquiring, constructing, expanding, maintaining and operating any project or facility, or participating in any research or development program, or performing any function which such municipality or joint agency may be authorized by general or local law to provide or perform.

In order to exercise the authority granted by this section, the governing authorities of any municipality or joint agency may:

Enter into and carry out contracts with the state or federal government or any agency or institution thereof under which such government, agency or institution grants financial or other assistance to the municipality or joint agency;

Accept such assistance or funds as may be granted or loaned by the state or federal government with or without such a contract;

Agree to and comply with any reasonable conditions which are imposed upon such grants or loans;

Make expenditures from any funds so granted.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 31, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-773.
Eminent domain; crossing lines and rights-of-way of utilities.

Municipalities participating in a joint project and joint agencies shall possess the power of eminent domain for a project authorized by this article to the extent and in the same manner and under the same laws now available to municipalities under the laws of this state; provided, however, a municipality or joint agency exercising the power of eminent domain for a project authorized by this article shall have no power to condemn any facilities or property owned by a public utility or electric power association for the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power and energy.

The lines and rights-of-way of any public utility or of electric power associations or of municipalities participating in a joint project or of any joint agency may be crossed by any municipalities participating in a joint project or by any joint agency. The lines of any municipality participating in a joint project or of any joint agency may be crossed by any public utility or electric power association. Provided, however, the amount of damages, if any, resulting to the line or right-of-way from the crossing thereof as provided herein shall be determined by the affected parties and shall be paid by the public utility, electric power association, municipality or municipalities participating in a joint project, or joint agency to the owner of the lines or rights-of-way crossed. When the parties affected cannot agree upon the damages to be paid for the crossing, either party may file with the circuit court of the county in which the crossing occurs a petition seeking a determination of the amount of the damages. Said action shall be tried by jury at the next regular term of said court in the same manner and under the same principles as provided for the determination of damages in eminent domain proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 32, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).